Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5395.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration of
Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-4. Proof of payment of sales or use tax.
(a) Each person, before obtaining an original or transferral registration for a motor vehicle
in this state, shall furnish evidence that any tax due with reference to the motor vehicle pursuant to
the provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of title 44 has been paid in accordance with regulations
prescribed by the tax administrator, and on any forms that are approved by the tax administrator
and the state administrator of the division of motor vehicles. The administrator of the division of
motor vehicles shall, upon the request of the tax administrator, and after due hearing by the tax
administrator, suspend or revoke a motor vehicle registration of any person who fails to pay any
tax due in connection with the sale, storage, use, or other consumption of the motor vehicle pursuant
to the provisions of chapters 18 and 19.
(b) Any taxpayer may dispute the valuation of a motor vehicle, upon which value the sales
tax is calculated, whether based upon the National Automotive Dealers Association Clean Retail
book value or the sales price, whichever is higher. The taxpayer shall have a right to a hearing to
appeal the valuation. The tax administrator shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this
appeals process.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001135
========
LC001135 - Page 2 of 3